Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1412.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 414.2. Transition to Chip-Enabled Access Cards.--(a) To the extent money is appropriated for the purposes under this section , the department shall transition all access cards for use in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program to include chip-enabled technology no later than January 1, 2028.(b) The department shall implement the transition under subsection (a) in a manner that balances efficiency and cost- effectiveness and provides enhanced security features such as tap-to-pay technology or other technology to prevent benefit theft.12345678910111213141516171819 (c) The department shall provide one chip-enabled access card per eligible recipient at no cost to the recipient.(d) The department shall: (1) Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, issue an initial report evaluating the transition under subsection (a) to:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(2) Following the initial report under paragraph (1), issue a report every 180 days until chip-enabled access cards have been made available in each county.(3) Perform outreach to vendors on the transition under subsection (a), including system upgrades that a vendor may need to implement.(4) Perform outreach to recipients on the transition, including posting on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, in a shareable format, resources and frequently asked questions regarding the use of access cards with chip-enabled technology.(5) Establish a procedure to distribute access cards to eligible recipients in emergency situations.(6) Take necessary steps, where possible, to maximize funding with Federal or other funding sources by October 1, 2026.(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the department's authority to implement future changes to access cards to enhance benefit security.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1412PN1881 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930